en: Red kuri squash
es: Cucurbita maxima
fr: Potimarron

en: Red kuri pulp, Red kuri squash pulp
fr: Pulpe de potimarron

en: Sweet green hokkaido pulp, Sweet green hokkaido squash
fr: Pulpe de courge hokkaïdo

en: Cooked spaghetti squash pulp
fr: Pulpe de courge spaghetti cuite

en: Spaghetti squash pulp
fr: Pulpe de courge spaghetti

en: Fresh squash
fr: Courges fraîches, Courge fraîche
nl: Verse pompenen

en: Canned squash
fr: Courge en conserve, Courge appertisée

en: Pumpkins, Winter squashs
bg: Тиква
de: Kürbisse
es: Calabazas
fi: kurpitsat
fr: Courges, Potirons, Citrouilles
he: דלעות, דלעת, דלועית, דלועיות
hr: Bundeve
ja: カボチャ, かぼちゃ, 南瓜
nl: Pompoenen

en: Sweet dumpling squashes, Sweet dumpling squash
fr: Patidou, Courges patidou

en: Pulp of melonnette jaspée from Vendée, Squash of melonnette jaspée from Vendée
fr: Pulpe de courge melonnette

en: Pattypan squash
xx: Patissons
fr: Pâtissons, Patissons
hr: Pattypan squash

en: Cooked pumpkins
fr: Potirons cuits, potiron cuit

en: Canned pumpkin
fr: Potiron en conserve, Potiron appertisé

en: Fresh pumpkins
fr: Courges fraîches Citrouilles fraîches, citrouille fraîche

en: Butternut squashes, Butternut squash, Butternut pumpkins, butternut squash, butternut pulp
es: Calabazas Butternut
fr: Courges Butternut, Butternut, Doubeurre, Courge doubeurre, Pulpe de courge doubeurre crue, Pulpe de courge butternut crue
hr: Butternut tikve
ja: バターナッツかぼちゃ
nl: Muskaatpompoen

en: Kabocha squashes, Japanese pumpkins
xx: Kabocha
ja: 栗かぼちゃ
ko: 단호박
th: ฟักทอง

en: Spaghetti squashes, Spaghetti squash
es: Calabazas espagueti, Calabazas spaghetti
fr: Courges spaghetti, courge spaghetti
hr: Špageti tikve
nl: Spaghettipompoenen

en: Fresh spaghetti squashes
fr: Courges spaghetti fraîches

en: Radishes, radish
am: ፍጁል
ar: فجل
az: Qırmızı turp
ba: Торма
be: Рэдзька пасяўная
bg: репичка
bn: মূলা
bo: ལ་ཕུག
br: Irvin-ruz
ca: rave
co: Radichju
cs: ředkvička
cy: Rhuddygl y gerddi
da: Radise
de: rettich, Radieschen
el: Ρεπάνι
eo: rafano
es: Rábanos, Rábano, Rabanitos
et: Redis
eu: Errefau
fa: ترب
fi: Retiisi
fr: radis
ga: Raidis
gl: Ravo
he: צנון
hi: मूली
hr: Rotkvice, Rotkvica
ht: Radi
hu: Retek
id: Lobak
is: Hreðka
it: ravanello
ja: ダイコン (広義)
jv: Lobak
ka: ბოლოკი
kk: Шомыр
km: مُج
kn: ಮೂಲಂಗಿ
ko: 무
ku: Tivir
kv: Кушман
ky: Түрп
la: Raphanus sativus
lv: redīsi
mk: ротквичка
ml: മുള്ളങ്കി
mn: Таримал манжин
mr: मुळा
nb: reddik
nl: radijs
nn: reddik
nv: Akétłʼóól łichxííʼí yázhí
oc: Rafe
or: ମୂଳା
os: Булкъ
pa: ਮੂਲੀ
pl: rzodkiew
ps: مولۍ
pt: Rabanete
qu: Rawanushcu
ro: Ridiche
ru: Редис
rw: Radi
sa: मूलकम्
sh: Rotkvica
sk: Reďkev siata
sl: Redkvica
sq: Rrepa
sr: Ротквица
su: Lobak
sv: Rädisa
ta: முள்ளங்கி
te: ముల్లంగి
tg: Турб
tl: Labanos
to: Lētisifoha
tr: Turp
tt: Редис
tv: Турма
uk: Редька
ur: لال مولی
uz: Turp
vi: Cải củ
wa: Rådisse
yi: רעטעך
za: lauxbaeg
zh: 萝卜

en: Fresh radishes
fr: Radis frais
nl: Verse radijs